Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202019-1310
Public funds; all-purpose levy; allocation.

If the method provided in section 19-1309 is followed in municipal financing, the city or village shall allocate the amount so raised to the several departments of such city or village in its annual budget and appropriation ordinance, or in other legal manner, as the governing body of such city or village shall deem wisest and best.

Laws 1957, c. 47, § 2, p. 227;

Laws 1967, c. 96, § 2, p. 294;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 112.